Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8296. BURLESON COUNTY MUNICIPAL UTILITY

DISTRICT NO. 1

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8296.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Burleson County Municipal Utility District No. 1.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Renumbered from Special District Local Laws Code, Section 8163.001 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(80), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 8296.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Burleson County created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Renumbered from Special District Local Laws Code, Section 8163.002 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(80), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 8296.003. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PUBLIC PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the boundaries of the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The creation of the district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Renumbered from Special District Local Laws Code, Section 8163.003 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(80), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 8296.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 4, Chapter 703, Acts of the 62nd Legislature, Regular Session, 1971 (Article 8280-587, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes), as that territory may have been modified under:

(1) Subchapter H, Chapter 54, Water Code;

(2) Subchapter J, Chapter 49, Water Code; or

(3) other law.

(b) The boundaries and field notes of the district form a closure. A mistake in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect:

(1) the district's organization, existence, and validity;

(2) the district's right to issue any type of bond for a purpose for which the district is created or to pay the principal of and interest on the bond;

(3) the district's right to impose a tax; or

(4) the legality or operation of the district or its governing body.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Renumbered from Special District Local Laws Code, Section 8163.004 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(80), eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8296.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The board of directors is composed of five elected directors.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Renumbered from Special District Local Laws Code, Section 8163.051 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(80), eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8296.101. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, and functions provided by general law applicable to a municipal utility district, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 920 (H.B. 3166), Sec. 1.10, eff. April 1, 2009.

Renumbered from Special District Local Laws Code, Section 8163.101 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(80), eff. September 1, 2009.